Vermont statutes. Title 19 Highways
Subchapter 8. Neglect of Town to Build Highways or Bridges

§ 781.
Assessment.

When a town does not perform the order of the Supreme or Superior Court as to building a highway or building a bridge, the court may, on application, assess the town a sum sufficient to build and complete the highway or bridge.
The assessment shall be spent in building the highway or bridge under the direction of a commissioner to be appointed by the court.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 269

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

§ 782.
Application; service of citation.

The application may be made by one or more of the original petitioners for the highway or bridge within three years from the expiration of the time prescribed by the court order for the performance, and, with a citation, shall be served on one of the selectmen of the town to be proceeded against, within 21 days from the date of the application, notifying the town to appear and show cause why the request of the application should not be granted.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 269

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

§ 783.
Trial by jury; costs.

The town may have a trial by jury regarding its neglect to perform the order of the court and the court may award costs to either party.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 269

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

§ 784.
Suspension of assessment upon discontinuance of highway or bridge.

When a highway or bridge established by a court is discontinued in whole or in part and before the assessment under section 781 of this title has been spent according to the court order, the town assessed may apply to have the court suspend the collection of the assessment in whole or in part and order the assessment in whole or in part to be spent for building any highway or bridge that the town is liable to build.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 269

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.